South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S246.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 46-9-110 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 46-9-110.  Local ordinances(A) Except as provided in subsection (B), a local ordinance pertaining to the subject matter assigned by law to the commission, whether or not in conflict, are is void. (B) A unit of local government may adopt an ordinance restricting within its jurisdiction the use of any pesticide product that contains one or more of the following active ingredients: (1) brodifacoum; (2) bromadiolone; (3) difenacoum; and (4) difethialone. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----